Virginia statutes. Title 59.1. Trade and Commerce.
Chapter 28. Heavy Equipment Dealer Act.

§ 59.1-353.
Chapter title; definitions.

This chapter may be cited as the “Heavy Equipment Dealer Act.” As used in this chapter unless the context requires otherwise:

“Agreement” means a commercial relationship, not required to be evidenced in writing, of definite or indefinite duration, between a supplier and a dealer pursuant to which the dealer has been authorized to distribute one or more of the supplier’s heavy
equipment products, and attachments and repair parts therefor, and in connection therewith to use a trade name, trademark, service mark, logo type, or advertising or other commercial symbol.

“Dealer” means a person in Virginia (i) engaged in the business of selling or leasing heavy equipment at retail, (ii) who customarily maintains a total inventory, valued at over $250,000, of new heavy equipment and attachments and repair parts therefor,
and (iii) who provides repair services for the heavy equipment sold.

“Heavy equipment” means self-propelled, self-powered or pull-type equipment and machinery, including engines, weighing 5000 pounds or more, primarily employed for construction, industrial, maritime, mining and forestry uses, as such terms are commonly
used and understood as a usage of trade in accordance with §

8.1A-303(c)

. The term “heavy equipment” shall not include (i) motor vehicles requiring registration and certificates of title in accordance with §

46.2-600

, (ii) farm machinery, equipment and implements sold or leased pursuant to dealer agreements with suppliers subject to the provisions of Chapter 27.1 (§ 59.1-352.1 et seq.) of this title, or (iii) equipment that is “consumer
goods” within the meaning of §

8.9A-102

.

“Person” means a natural person, corporation, partnership, trust, agency or other entity as well as the individual officers, directors or other persons in active control of the activities of each such entity. “Person” also includes heirs, assigns, personal
representatives, guardians and conservators.

“Supplier” means every person, including any agent of such person, or any authorized broker acting on behalf of that person, that enters into an “agreement” with a dealer.

History.
1988, c. 73; 1997, c. 801; 2002, c. 898; 2003, c. 353.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1997, c. 801, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on January 1, 1998. The powers granted and duties imposed pursuant to this act shall apply prospectively to guardians and conservators appointed by court order
entered on or after that date, or modified on or after that date if the court so directs, without regard to when the petition was filed. The procedures specified in this act governing proceedings for appointment of a guardian or conservator
or termination or other modification of a guardianship shall apply on and after that date without regard to when the petition therefor was filed or the guardianship or conservatorship created.”

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 898 substituted “Chapter 27.1 (§ 59.1-352.1 et seq.” for “Chapter 27 (§ 59.1-344 et seq.” in the definition of “Heavy equipment.”

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 353 substituted “8.1A-303(c)” for “8.1-205 (2)” in the definition of “Heavy equipment.”

Law Review.

For article, “Antitrust and Trade Regulation,” see 35 U. Rich. L. Rev. 453 (2001).

§ 59.1-354.
Cancellation.

Notwithstanding the terms, provisions or conditions of any agreement, no supplier shall unilaterally amend, cancel, terminate or refuse to continue to renew any agreement, or unilaterally cause a dealer to resign from an agreement, unless the supplier
has first complied with the provisions of § 59.1-355, and good cause exists for amendment, termination, cancellation, nonrenewal, noncontinuance or causing a resignation. “Good cause” shall not include the sale or purchase of a
supplier. “Good cause” shall be limited to withdrawal by the supplier, its successors and assigns, of the sale of its products in Virginia, or dealer performance deficiencies including, but not limited to, the following:

Bankruptcy or receivership of the dealer;

Assignment for the benefit of creditors or similar disposition of the assets of the dealer, other than the creation of a security interest in the assets of a dealer for the purpose of securing financing in the ordinary course of business; or

Failure by the dealer to substantially comply, without reasonable cause or justification, with any reasonable and material requirement imposed upon him in writing by the supplier including, but not limited to, a substantial failure by a dealer to (i)
maintain a sales volume or trend of his supplier’s product line or lines comparable to that of other similarly situated dealers of that product line, or (ii) render services comparable in quality, quantity or volume to
the services rendered by other dealers of the same product or product line similarly situated.In any determination as to whether a dealer has failed to substantially comply, without reasonable excuse or justification, with
any reasonable and material requirement imposed upon him by the supplier, consideration shall be given to the relative size, population, geographical location, number of retail outlets and demand for the products applicable
to the market area of the dealer in question and to comparable market area.

No supplier shall be required to give notice or show good cause pursuant to subsection A of this section to unilaterally amend agreements with dealers to comply with federal or state law or, where not inconsistent with this chapter, to uniformly amend
agreements as to all dealers of the supplier in question in all states in which the supplier is marketing its products.

In any dispute as to whether a supplier has acted with good cause as required by this section the supplier shall have the burden of proof to establish that good cause existed.

History.
1988, c. 73.

§ 59.1-355.
Notice of intent to terminate.

Except as provided in subsection D of this section, a supplier shall provide a dealer at least 120 days’ prior written notice of any intention to amend, terminate, cancel or not renew any agreement. The notice shall state all the reasons for the intended
amendment, termination, cancellation or nonrenewal.

Where such reason or reasons relate to a condition or conditions which may be rectified by action of the dealer, he shall have seventy-five days in which to take such action and, within such seventy-five-day period, shall give written notice to the supplier
if and when such action is taken. If such condition or conditions have been rectified by action of the dealer, then the proposed amendment, termination, cancellation or nonrenewal shall be void and without legal effect. However,
where the supplier contends that action on the part of the dealer has not rectified one or more of such conditions, such supplier must give written notice thereof to the dealer within fifteen days after the dealer gave notice to
the supplier of the action taken.

During the 120-day notice period provided for in subsection A the dealer shall have the right to contract for a transfer of his business to another person who meets the material and reasonable qualifications and standards required by the supplier of its
dealers. The dealer shall give notice of any such transfer to the supplier at least forty-five days prior to the expiration of the 120-day notice period.

No notice shall be required and an agreement may be immediately terminated, amended, canceled or allowed to expire if the reason for the amendment, termination, cancellation or nonrenewal is:

The bankruptcy or receivership of the dealer;

An assignment for the benefit of the creditors or similar disposition of the assets of the business, other than the creation of a security interest in the assets of a dealer for the purpose of securing financing in the ordinary course of business;

Willful or intentional misrepresentation made by the dealer with the express intent to defraud the supplier;

Failure of the dealer to conduct its customary sales and service operations during its customary business hours for seven consecutive business days, unless such failure has resulted from acts of God, casualties, strikes, or other similar circumstances
beyond the dealer’s reasonable control;

Failure to pay any undisputed amount due the supplier continuing for thirty days after written notice thereof; or

A final conviction of the dealer of a felony.

History.
1988, c. 73.

§ 59.1-356.
Transfer of business.

No supplier shall unreasonably withhold or delay consent to any transfer of the dealer’s business or transfer of the stock or other interest in the dealership, whenever the dealer to be substituted meets the material and reasonable qualifications and
standards required of its dealers. Should a supplier determine that a proposed transferee does not meet its qualifications and standards, it shall give the dealer written notice thereof, stating the specific reasons for withholding
consent. No prospective transferee shall be disqualified to be a dealer because it is a publicly held corporation. A supplier shall have forty-five days to consider a dealer’s request to make a transfer under this subsection.

Notwithstanding any provision in subsection A of this section, no supplier shall withhold consent to, or in any manner retain a right of prior approval of, the transfer of the dealer’s business to a member or members of the family of the dealer or the
principal owner of the dealer. As used in this subsection, “family” means and includes the spouse, parent, siblings, children, stepchildren and lineal descendants, including those by adoption of the dealer or principal owner of
the dealer.

Whenever a transfer of a dealer’s business occurs, the transferee shall assume all the obligations imposed on and succeed to all the rights held by the selling dealer by virtue of any agreement, consistent with this chapter, between the selling dealer
and one or more suppliers entered into prior to the transfer.

In any dispute as to whether a supplier has denied consent in violation of this section, the supplier shall have the burden of proving a substantial and reasonable justification for the denial of consent.

History.
1988, c. 73.

§ 59.1-357.
Notices.

Notices required by this chapter shall be sent by certified or registered mail, postage prepaid.

History.
1988, c. 73.

§ 59.1-358.
Remedies.

Jurisdiction to hear and determine cases and controversies arising under provisions of this chapter shall be in the circuit court of the city or county wherein the dealer has its principal place of business in Virginia. The court may grant equitable relief
as is necessary to remedy the effects of conduct which it finds to exist and which is prohibited under this chapter, including, but not limited to, declaratory judgment and injunctive relief.

In addition to any other remedies available at law or in equity, if a supplier has attempted or accomplished an annulment, cancellation, termination or refused to continue or renew an agreement without good cause or withheld or delayed consent in violation
of § 59.1-354 or § 59.1-356, then the dealer shall be entitled to recover losses and damages, both general and special, proximately resulting therefrom, together with the cost of the action and reasonable legal fees. Such damages
shall include compensation for the value of the agreement and the good will of the dealer’s business, if any, arising therefrom.

Nothing contained herein shall bar the right of an agreement to provide for binding arbitration of disputes. Any such arbitration shall be consistent with the provisions of this chapter and Chapter 21 (§

8.01-577

et seq.) of Title 8.01, and the place of any such arbitration shall be in the city or county in which the dealer maintains his principal place of business in Virginia.

No supplier may cancel, terminate or refuse to continue to renew an agreement during the 120-day period set forth in § 59.1-355 or during the pendency of litigation or arbitration with respect thereto except under the conditions set forth in subsection
D of § 59.1-355.

History.
1988, c. 73.

§ 59.1-359.
Management.

No supplier shall require or prohibit any change in management or personnel of any dealer unless the current or potential management or personnel fails to meet reasonable qualifications and standards required by the supplier for its dealers.

History.
1988, c. 73.

§ 59.1-360.
Waiver of chapter void.

The provisions of this chapter shall be deemed to be incorporated in every agreement subject hereto and shall supersede and control all other provisions of the agreement inconsistent herewith. No supplier shall require any dealer to waive compliance with
any provision of this chapter. Any contract or agreement purporting to do so is void and unenforceable to the extent of the waiver or variance. Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to limit or prohibit good faith settlements
of disputes voluntarily entered into between the parties.

History.
1988, c. 73.

§ 59.1-361.
Applicability.

This chapter shall apply to agreements in effect as of January 1, 1988. In addition, the chapter shall apply to any agreements entered into after January 1, 1988. The provisions of this chapter are also applicable to any renewal or amendment of such agreements.

History.
1988, cc. 73, 865.

§ 59.1-362.
Reasonableness and good faith.

Every agreement entered into under this chapter shall impose on the parties the obligation to act in good faith.

This chapter shall impose on every term and provision of any agreement a requirement of reasonableness. Every term or provision of any agreement shall be interpreted so that the requirements or obligations imposed therein are reasonable.

History.
1988, c. 73.

§ 59.1-363.
Exclusions.

Agreements subject to the provisions of this chapter shall not be subject to any requirement contained in Chapter 8 (§

13.1-557

et seq.) of Title 13.1 or Chapter 27.1 (§ 59.1-352.1 et seq.) of this title.

History.
1988, c. 73; 2002, c. 898.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 898 substituted “Chapter 27.1 (§ 59.1-352.1 et seq.)” for “Chapter 27 (§ 59.1-344 et seq.).”